Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 4 Department of Public Safety Nomenclature

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) It is declared to be contrary to the health, safety, and public welfare of the people of this state for any individual or organization to act in a manner which would mislead the public into believing that a member of the public is dealing with the Department of Public Safety, the State Patrol, or with a member thereof when in fact the individual or organization is not the Department of Public Safety, the State Patrol, the state police, nor a member thereof. Furthermore, the Department of Public Safety, which has provided quality law enforcement services to the citizens of this state since 1937, has established a name for excellence in its field. This name should be protected for the department, its members, and the citizens of the state. Therefore, no person or organization should be allowed to use the department’s name or any term used to identify the department or its members without the expressed permission of the chief administrative officer of the department. The provisions of this Act are in furtherance of the promotion of this policy.

“(b) It is declared to be contrary to the health, safety, and public welfare of the people of this state for any individual or organization to act in a manner which would mislead the public into believing that a member of the public is dealing with the Georgia Bureau of Investigation or with an agent thereof when in fact the individual or organization is not the Georgia Bureau of Investigation nor an agent thereof. Furthermore, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, which has provided quality law enforcement services to the citizens of this state, has established a name for excellence in its field. This name should be protected for the bureau, its agents, and the citizens of this state. Therefore, no person or organization should be allowed to use the bureau’s name or any term used to identify the bureau or its agents without the expressed permission of the director of investigation. The provisions of this Act are in furtherance of the promotion of this policy.”

35-2-80.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Department of Public Safety Nomenclature Act of 1995.”

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-81.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Badge” means any official badge used by members of the Department of Public Safety, either in the past or currently.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety.

“Department” means the Department of Public Safety.

“Emblem” means any official patch or other emblem worn currently or formerly or used by the department to identify the department or its employees.

“Person” means any person, corporation, organization, or political subdivision of the State of Georgia.

“Willful violator” means any person who knowingly violates the provisions of this article. Any person who violates this article after being advised in writing by the commissioner that such person’s activity is in violation of this article shall be considered a willful violator and shall be considered in willful violation of this article. Any person whose agent or representative is a willful violator and who has knowledge of the violation by the agent or representative shall also be considered a willful violator and in willful violation of this article unless, upon learning of the violation, he or she immediately terminates the agency or other relationship with such violator.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-82.
Permission required for use of department nomenclature.

Whoever, except with the written permission of the commissioner, knowingly uses the words “Georgia Department of Public Safety,” “State Patrol,” “State Police,” “State Highway Patrol,” “State Trooper,” or “State Patrolman” in connection with any advertisement, circular, book, pamphlet, or other publication, play, motion picture, broadcast, telecast, or other production in a manner reasonably calculated to convey the impression that such advertisement, circular, book, pamphlet, or other publication, play, motion picture, broadcast, telecast, or other production is approved, endorsed, or authorized by or associated with the department shall be in violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-83.
Permission required for use of department symbols.

Any person who uses or displays any symbol, including any emblem, seal, or badge, current or historical, used by the department without written permission from the commissioner shall be in violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-84.
Procedure for seeking permission to use department nomenclature or symbols.

Any person wishing permission to use either department nomenclature or symbols may request such permission in writing to the commissioner. The commissioner shall serve notice on the requesting party within 15 calendar days after receipt of the request of his or her decision on whether the person may use the nomenclature or the symbol. If the commissioner does not respond within the 15 day time period, then the request is presumed to have been denied. The grant of permission under Code Section 35-2-82 or 35-2-83 shall be in the discretion of the commissioner under such conditions as the commissioner may impose. If the commissioner denies such request and the person making such request reasonably believes that the commissioner has acted in bad faith or based on an illegal motive, then the person may, within 15 days after the person’s request was denied or granted on limited terms, file an appeal with the Board of Public Safety. The matter will then be considered before the board, but the burden will be with the person making the request to show that the request was improperly denied or limited.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-85.
Injunctions against violations.

Whenever there shall be an actual or threatened violation of Code Section 35-2-82 or 35-2-83, the commissioner shall have the right to apply to the Superior Court of Fulton County or to the superior court of the county of residence of the violator for an injunction to restrain the violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-86.
Civil penalties.

In addition to any other relief or sanction for a violation of Code Section 35-2-82 or 35-2-83, where the violation is willful, the commissioner shall be entitled to collect a civil penalty in the amount of $500.00 for each violation. Further, when there is a finding of willful violation, the commissioner shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees for bringing any action against the violator. The commissioner shall be entitled to seek civil sanctions in the Superior Court of Fulton County or in the county of residence of the violator.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-87.
Damage suits against violators.

Any person who has given money or any other item of value to another person due in part to such person’s use of department nomenclature or symbols in violation of this article may maintain a suit for damages against the violator. Where it is proven that the violation was willful, the victim shall be entitled to recover treble damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-87

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.

35-2-88.
Criminal penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to a fine of not less than $1,000.00 nor more than $5,000.00 or to imprisonment for not less than one and not more than five years, or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-88

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 925, § 2.